Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-661
Contracts with city or village; terms and conditions.

Contracts, other than franchises, which such city or village is empowered to make with any such district to furnish such city or village, or its inhabitants, with electrical energy, shall be made in the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as such city or village is now or hereafter empowered to make with any private corporation to furnish such city or village, or its inhabitants, with electrical energy.

Laws 1939, c. 89, §1, p. 388;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-713;

R.S.1943, § 70-661.

Under former act, concluding proviso of this section was unconstitutional as special legislation. State ex rel. Johnson v. Consumers Public Power Dist., 143 Neb. 753, 10 N.W.2d 784 (1943).